src/phonology/smj-phon.twolc
 LowerG2  !!≈ ; @CODE@ : A definition of Grade2 consonant sequences referring mostly to the surface level
 		   = [
               [
                  (Cns:0)  LCnsPhon7 (Cns:0) LCnsPhon (Cns:0)            ! xy that cannot be G3, since x cannot form xy G3.
               |                                                         ! nijbe,
                  [           ! This section is for 3-cons G2. and for 2cns G2 that share the initial cns with 2cns G3
                     (Cns:0) [:j|:l|:m|:n|:v] (Cns:0) :s :t                  ! S9, 3cns-G2 bäjstov, etc.
                  |
                     (Cns:0) [ :l | :r | :n | :j ]      (Cns:0) :s :k                   ! S9, 3cns-G2 sválskes, etc.
                  |
                     (Cns:0) [  ! 2cns G2 that share the initial cns wit 2cns G3
                                :b (Cns:0) [ :d | :m | :j | :l | :n | :n :j | :r | :s | :t :j | :t :s  ] ! S9, initial b
                                |                                                                        ! gábdev
                                :d (Cns:0) [ :j | :n | :n :j ]                                           ! S7, initial d
                                |                                                                        ! iednev
                                :g (Cns:0) :ŋ                                                            ! S7, initial g
                                |                                                                        ! låg0ŋot
                                :k (Cns:0) [ :n | :k ]                                                   ! S7, initial k
                                |
                                :g (Cns:0) :n                                                            !däggna:degna                        
                             ]                                                                           !
                             |
                             :r (Cns:0)   :s :j :t                                                    ! S9, rsjt, bårsjtav
                  ]
               ]
                 - [ ! Exclude the following sequences, since these are in reality G3:
                     [ d t [ s | j ] ]
                     | b b
                     | d d
                     | g g
                     | k [ s | t | t j | t s ]
                     | f º:0 f
                     | l º:0 l
                     | m º:0 m
                     | n º:0 n
                     | n º:0 n j
                     | ŋ º:0 ŋ
                     | r º:0 r
                     | s º:0 s
                     | s º:0 s j
                     | v º:0 v
                   ]
             ];
 LowerG1  !!≈ ; @CODE@ : A definition of Grade 1 consonant sequences
           =   (Cns:0)   LCnsPhon ;
 LowerG12  !!≈ ; @CODE@ : A definition of Grade 1 or 2 consonant sequences 
           = [ LowerG1 | LowerG2 ] ;

 G32  !!≈ ; @CODE@ : A definition of Grade 3 or 2 consonant sequences
 	 =  f º:0 f | l º:0 l | m º:0 m | n º:0 n | n º:0 n j | ŋ º:0 ŋ | r º:0 r | s º:0 s | s º:0 s j | v º:0 v ;

 G3  !!≈ ; @CODE@ : A definition of Grade 3 consonant sequences 
 	=[ Cns Cns Cns Cns |
      :b b m|
      :d d [n|j]|
      :g g ŋ|
      k k n|
      l l [d|j|t]|
      m m [b|p]|
      n n d|
      ŋ ŋ [g|k]|
      p p [s|t]|
      s s[k|m|n|t]|
      b [d d|j j|l l|n n|r r|s s]|
      j [b b|d d|g g|k k|l l|m m| (h) n n|ŋ ŋ|p p|r r|s s|t t|v v]|
      l [b b|f f|g g|k k|m m|ŋ ŋ|p p|s s|v v]|
      m [k k|s s]|
      n s s|
       ŋ [n n |t t]|
       r [b b|[d|:d] d|f f|g g|j j|k k|m m|n n|ŋ ŋ|p p|s s|t t|v v|d d]|
       v [d d|g g|k k|l l| (h) n n|ŋ ŋ|r r|s s|t t]|
       h [[k|:k] k|[p|:p] p|[t|:t] t]|
       d t [j|s]|
       b b|d d|g g|
       k[s|t[j|s]]] ;

!diphtsimpl IF Vow: G32 AND G2 context - [Y6 Y7 Y9];
! oa:å <=> Vow: G32 Vow: WeG ; ! Evt. a subset of WeG, if only some WeG Dummys trigger diphtsimpl

! 1.86, let's see
!
!Definitions
!
! CnsPhon = [ [ Cns7 | Cns8: ] | n j | s j | t j | t s ] ;
! G3      = [ [ CnsPhon CnsPhon [ CnsPhon+ | º] ] - [[[j|l|m|n|v] s t ] | [l|r] s k | r s j t ] ] ;
! G2      = [   CnsPhon CnsPhon |                   [[[j|l|m|n|v] s t ] | [l|r] s k | r s j t ] ] ;
! G1      =     CnsPhon ;
! G12     = [ G1 | G2 ] ;
!
! LowerCnsPhon = [ :Cns7 | :n :j | :s :j | :t :j | :t :s ] ;
! LowerG2  = [ (Cns:0)  LowerCnsPhon (Cns:0) LowerCnsPhon (Cns:0) |
!              (Cns:0) [[[:j|:l|:m|:n|:v] :s :t ] |
!              (Cns:0) [:l|:r] :s :k |
!              (Cns:0)  :r :s :j :t ] ] ;
! LowerG1  = (Cns:0)   LowerCnsPhon ;
! LowerG12 = [ LowerG1 | LowerG2 ] ;



Rules !!≈ !!!The @CODE@ section

!! !!Overview

!! The rules section has the following chapters: Consonant alternations in certain pos, vowel lengthening, diphthong simplification, stem vowel alternations, consonant gradation rules


!! !!Consonant alternations in certain pos

!! All rules deal with word-final position.

! This is a dummy negative test, in order to get the test paradigm work.

!!$ a
!!$ b


"Word Final Devoicing of Certain Single Consonants d9 etc." 
!! __@RULENAME@__  
 Cx:Cy <=> Vow: (Cns:) (%>:) (»:) ( Dummy: ) _ (%>:) (»:) ( Dummy: ) \[ Vow | Cns ]* [ Hyph | ( ∑ ) # | .#. ] ;
       where Cx in ( b9 d9 g9 m9 h9 )
             Cy in ( p  t  k  v  j  )
	   matched ;
!!€ iemed9#
!!€ iemet#

"Word final weakening -tj and -ttj to -sj part 1"
!! __@RULENAME@__  
 t:s <= Vow: (%>:) (»:) ( Dummy: ) ( d: ) _ j (%>:) (»:) ( Dummy: ) \[ Vow | Cns ]* [ Hyph | ( ∑ ) # | .#. ] ;


"Word final weakening -tj and -ttj to -sj part 2"
!! __@RULENAME@__  
 t:s => Vow: (%>:) (»:) ( Dummy: ) ( d: ) _ j (%>:) (»:) ( Dummy: ) \[ Vow | Cns ]* [ Hyph | ( ∑ ) # | .#. ] ;
! t:s <=> Vow: (%>:) (»:) ( Dummy: ) _ ( t: ) j (%>:) (»:) ( Dummy: ) [ Hyph | ( ∑ ) # | .#. ] ;
!!€ jågåtj
!!€ jågåsj

!!€ gålºleX7tj
!!€ gål0lå0sj

!"Word final weakening of -ttj to -sj"
! t:0 <=> Vow: t:s _ j (%>:) (»:) [ Hyph | ( ∑ ) # | .#. ] ;
! oajválattja : oajválasj This is moved to the t:0 rule set.
! Still, this will fail if and when clitics are added to the word.
! d:s changed to d:

"Word Final Deletion of n8 m8 g8 h8"
!! __@RULENAME@__  
  Cx:0 <=> Vow _  (%>:) (»:) X3: ;
	where Cx in ( DelCns ) ;
! The twoL-sme had [X4:|X8:|X6: Cons:|X9:], be prepared to
! expand this rule accordingly.

!!€ loavddag8X3#
!!€ l0åv0da00#


"Word Final Neutralization of g8, h8, m8"
!! __@RULENAME@__  
  Cx:Cy <=> Vow _  (%>:) (»:) X2: [ Hyph | ( ∑ ) # | .#. ]  ;
			where Cx in (g8 h8 m8)
			      Cy in (t  t  n )
			matched ;
! The twol-sme had [X2: | X7: ], be prepared to expand this rule accordingly.
! Since we use X2, the "2" in g8 etc. may be superfluous...

!"Word-final Devoicing of d9, m9"
! Cx:Cy <=> Vow _  (%>:) (»:) [ Hyph | ( ∑ ) # | .#. ] ;
!       where Cx in ( d9 m9 )
!	          Cy in ( t  v  )
!	     matched ;
! iemet:iemeda


"Deleting Final h9 in Short Essive of Uneven Syllables"
!! __@RULENAME@__  
 h9:0 <=> Vow: _ (%>:) (»:) Q1: X1: n ;

"Deleting Final l9 in Short Essive of Uneven Syllables"
!! __@RULENAME@__  
 l9:0 <=> Vow: _ (%>:) (»:) [Q1:|X3:] X1: n ;

"Deleting Final m9 in Short Essive of Uneven Syllables"
!! __@RULENAME@__  
 m9:0 <=> Vow: _ (%>:) (»:) Q1: X1: n ;

"Deleting Final n9 in Short Essive of Uneven Syllables"
!! __@RULENAME@__  
 n9:0 <=> Vow: _ (%>:) (»:) Q1: X1: n ;

"Deleting Final r9 in Short Essive of Uneven Syllables"
!! __@RULENAME@__  
 r9:0 <=> Vow: _ (%>:) (»:) Q1: X1: n ;



!      where Cx in ( s m h ) ;
! originally it was true for s, m, h. Keep an eye on this.

!"Word Final Cluster Simplification"  ! málestit : máles
! t:0 <=> Vow (%>:) (»:) ( Dummy: ) s _ (%>:) (»:) (Hyph) [ Hyph | ( ∑ ) # | .#. ]  ;
!be prepared to define more rules on cluster simpl.
!moved to Consonant gradation
!!€ málest#
!!€ máles0#


!! !!Vowel lengthening

!! The second syllable vowel a is lengthened to á whenever the stem consonants are in grade 1 and the first syllable vowel is short. Short vowels cannot preceed and follow a single intervocalic consonant.

"Compulsatory lengthening in grade I even-syllables"
!! __@RULENAME@__  
! a:á <=>  Cns  [ a|i|u ] [ Cns:0 Cns: | Cns: Cns:0 ] _ (%>:) (»:) WeG: ; ! in grade I. Gussa-gusá

  a:á <=>       [ a|i|u ] [ Cns:0 Cns: (%>:) (»:) | Cns: Cns:0 (%>:) (»:) ] _ (Cns:0 | Cns:) (%>:) (»:) WeG:      ; ! in grade I
                [ a|i|u ]   Cns:0 [ n | s | t ] j                           _ ( StemCns: )   (%>:) (»:) WeG:      ; ! nj, sj, tj in grade I
                [ a|i|u ]   Cns:0        t s                                _                (%>:) (»:) WeG:      ; ! ts in grade I
	                        Cns                                             _                (%>:) (»:) Y2:       ; ! Indicative Present Singular 3rd Final Vowel in verbs. Bassat-bassá
                                                                            _                (%>:) (»:) Y6: X4: j ; ! Ill sg of Actor nouns bassat : basse : basºsáj
                                                                            _                (%>:) (»:) Y7:       ; ! Diminutive of Actor nouns bassat : basse : bassásj
                                                                            _                (%>:) (»:) Y6: X4: ( X8: ) [ m | t | d | s ] ; ! Compulsary e:á in Px, Actors! sállat : sálle : sállám
! where Vx in ( a i u ) ; ! not all simple vowels ( e o å æ ) are evidently long!
!!€ gussaQ1#
!!€ gu0sá0#
!!€ skihpaQ1s#
!!€ ski0bá0s#

! the right-context facultative consonant in order to ensure skibás.
!"Compulsatory lengthening in palatal grade I even-syllables"
! a:á <=> Cns [ a|i|u ] [ n | s | t ] j _ WeG: ; ! nj, sj, tj in grade I
! where Vx in ( a i u ) ; ! not all simple vowels ( e o å æ ) are evidently long!
! example?
! delete if preceeding works

!! !!Diphtong simplification

!! The diphthong simplification handles oa:å and æ:e. Phonologically, these are identical processes, but since the dipthong is written by two letters in the former case and by one letter in the latter, the alternations must be handled separately. This section also handles ie:æ, these are in principle the same as oa:å, but the alternation does not occur in so many contexts. 

!!The oa:å simplification has a two-art rule, one for o deletion, and one for a:å change. Otherwise, the rules are identical (this is the type where xfst would have been better than twolc).
